Hawaii statutes.
§551-22 Estates less than $100. When
the whole estate of a person over the age of eighteen for whom a conservator
could be appointed does not exceed the value of $100, the court, in its
discretion, without the appointment of a conservator or the giving of bond, may
authorize the deposit thereof in a depository authorized to receive fiduciary
funds in the name of a suitable person designated by the court, or if the
assets do not consist of money, authorize the delivery thereof to a suitable
person designated by the court. The person receiving such money or other
assets shall hold and dispose of the same in such manner as the court shall
direct. [L 1965, c 6, §2; Supp, §338-5.5; HRS §551-22; am L 1976, c 200, pt of
§1; am L 1977, c 144, §55; am L 2004, c 161, §18]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next